DTC P1211 [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]


id0102f1836100

DTC P1211

Common rail pressure higher/lower than desired (engine running)

DETECTION CONDITION
•  The PCM monitors difference of common rail fuel pressure at each cylinders fuel delivery timing using fuel injection amount when the engine is running. The difference in fuel injection amount between a cylinder and another one higher than threshold value, the PCM determines that the common rail pressure higher or lower than desired.
Diagnostic support note
•  The MIL illuminates if the PCM detects the above malfunction condition in two consecutive drive cycles or in one drive cycle while the DTC for the same malfunction has been stored in the PCM.
•  PENDING CODE is available if the PCM detects the above malfunction condition during first drive cycle.
•  FREEZE FRAME DATA is available.
•  The DTC is stored in the PCM memory.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  Supply pump malfunction
•  Fuel injector malfunction
•  Fuel injector related harness intermittently malfunction
•  Suction control valve related harness intermittently malfunction
•  PCM connector poor connection
•  PCM malfunction

Diagnostic procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

ACTION

1
VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
•  Has FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
2
VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
•  Check for related service repair information availability?
Yes
Perform repair or diagnosis according to the available repair information.
•  If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
3
IDENTIFY TRIGGER DTC FOR FREEZE FRAME DATA
•  Is DTC P1211 on FREEZE FRAME DATA?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Go to troubleshooting procedures for DTC in FREEZE FRAME DATA.
4
VERIFY FUEL LEAKAGE BETWEEN COMMON RAIL AND FUEL INJECTOR
•  Start the engine.
•  Verify that fuel leakage from the fuel line between common rail and each cylinders fuel injector.
•  Is there any fuel leakage?
Yes
Repair or replace for fuel leakage, then go to Step 11.
No
Go to the next step.
5
VERIFY FUEL INJECTOR OPERATION
•  Perform Fuel Injector Operation Inspection.
•  Do fuel injectors operate properly for each cylinder?
Yes
Go to the Step 7.
No
Go to the next step.
6
VERIFY INTERMITTENT OPEN OR SHORT AT FUEL INJECTOR HARNESS AND CONNECTOR
•  Start the engine.
•  Shake fuel injector harness for each cylinder.
•  Does the engine speed drop or stall?
Yes
Inspect and harness and connector.
Repair or replace malfunctioning part according inspection result, then go to Step 11.
No
Inspect fuel injector.
Then go to Step 11.
7
VERIFY INTERMITTENT OPEN OR SHORT AT SUCTION CONTROL VALVE HARNESS AND CONNECTOR
•  Start the engine.
•  Shake suction control valve harness for each cylinder.
•  Does the engine speed drop or stall?
Yes
Inspect and harness and connector.
Repair or replace malfunctioning part according inspection result, then go to Step 11.
No
Go to the next step.
8
INSPECT SUCTION CONTROL VALVE
•  Inspect the suction control valve.
•  Is the suction control valve normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the supply pump, then go to Step 11.
9
INSPECT SUPPLY PUMP
•  Inspect the supply pump.
•  Is the supply pump normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the supply pump, then go to Step 11.
10
INSPECT PCM CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
•  Turn the engine switch off.
•  Disconnect the PCM connector.
•  Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged/pulled-out pins, and corrosion).
•  Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace terminal, then go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
11
VERIFY TROUBLESHOOTING OF DTC P1211 COMPLETED
•  Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
•  Turn the engine switch to ON position (engine off).
•  Clear the DTC from PCM memory using the M-MDS.
•  Start the engine.
•  Is the same DTC present?
Yes
Replace the PCM, go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
12
VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
•  Perform “AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE”.
•  Is any DTC present?
Yes
Go to the applicable DTC inspection.
No
Troubleshooting completed.